Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.140

Sentence to confinement.

All military courts of the organized militia of Washington shall have power to sentence to confinement in lieu of fines authorized to be imposed: PROVIDED, That such sentence of confinement shall not exceed one day for each dollar of fine authorized.

[ 1943 c 130 s 61; 1917 c 107 s 53; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-61.]